Utah statutes.
38-8-4.   Posting of notice.

Each owner acting under this chapter shall keep posted in a prominent place in his office at all times a notice which reads as follows:

"All articles stored by a rental agreement, and charges not having been paid for 30 days, will be sold or otherwise disposed of to pay charges."



Enacted by Chapter 171, 1981 General Session

